California, session 20252026, AB799.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2780.6 is added to the Penal Code, to read:2780.6. (a) Notwithstanding paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 3370 of the Labor Code, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, shall, pursuant to subdivision (b), pay a death benefit in an amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (c) for the death of any state prison incarcerated individual hand crew member assigned to the California Conservation Camp program.(b) The death benefit shall be paid within 60 days of the death of an incarcerated individual hand crew member to the beneficiary designated by the crew member to receive the death benefit if the crew member dies during any of the following circumstances:(1) During, and resulting from, the performance of their duties on an active deployment.(2) During, and resulting from, the performance of their duties completing firefighter Conservation Camp training exercises.(3) While physically or mentally incapacitated due to and resulting from their performance of their duties as described in paragraph (1) or (2).(c) The death benefit shall be the sum of the following amounts:(1) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).(2) An amount equal to 50 percent of the annual compensation earned by the deceased crew member during the 12 months immediately preceding the death of the crew member.